District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
2 act may be cited as the “Neighborhood Management Authority Act of 2025”.
3 TITLE I. GENERAL PROVISIONS.
4 Sec. 102. Formation.
5 Each Neighborhood Management Authority shall be organized as an instrumentality of
6 the District Government, which shall have a separate legal existence within the District
7 Government.
8 Sec. 103. Powers.
9 Each Neighborhood Management Authority (“Authority”) established pursuant to this act
2

10 shall have the power to:
11 (1) Sue and be sued in its name;
12 (2) Adopt a seal and alter the seal at its pleasure;
13 (3) Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws governing the manner in which it may conduct
14 business and how the powers vested in it may be exercised;
15 (4) Borrow money for any of its purposes, as may be permitted under Chapter 2 of Title 1
16 and other laws of the District; provided, that the Authority’s debts shall not be subject to and
17 shall not be backed by the full faith and credit of the District of Columbia;
18 (5) To issue bonds and to give security pursuant to section 112 of this Act; provided, that
19 the Authority's debts shall not be backed by the full faith and credit of the District of Columbia;
20 (6) To provide for the payment of obligations as may be permitted under the Home Rule
21 Act, and other laws of the District;
22 (7) To the extent permitted under its contracts with bond holders of the Authority, to
23 consent to any modification with respect to rate of interest, time and payment of any installment
24 of principal or interest, security or any other term of any contract, loan, loan commitment, or
25 contract or agreement of any kind to which the Authority is a party;
26 (8) To employ officers, executives, and management personnel who may:
27 (A) Formulate or participate in the formulation of the plans, policies, and
28 standards;
29 (B) Administer, manage, or operate the Authority, fix their qualifications, and
30 prescribe their duties and other terms of employment, compensation, and benefits; and
31 (C) Employ other personnel as may be necessary;
32 (9) To retain or employ advisers, consultants, and agents, including financial advisers,
3

33 appraisers, accountants, auditors, engineers, private consultants, and legal counsel for rendering
34 professional, management, or technical services and advice, and to fix their compensation;
35 (10) Establish polices for contracting and procurement that are consistent with the
36 principles of competitive procurement and, subject to District law, make and execute contracts,
37 leases, and all other agreements or instruments necessary and appropriate for the exercise of its
38 powers and the fulfillment of its purposes;
39 (11) To enter into contracts, memorandums of understanding, and other financing
40 agreements with any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or the District
41 and private parties; and
42 (12) Notwithstanding other provisions of law and subject to Council approval by
43 resolution, acquire, construct, and dispose of real or personal property of every kind.
44 Sec. 104. Budget formulation and transparency.
45 (a) The Board shall prepare and submit to the Mayor an operating budget on the date that
46 District departments and agencies are required to submit proposed budgets to the Mayor. Prior to
47 submission to the Mayor, the proposed operating budget must be certified by the Chief Financial
48 Officer of the District of Columbia as being balanced.
49 (b) The Authority shall contract at least once each year with an independent certified
50 public accountant to audit its books and accounts. Within 10 days after receiving the results of
51 the audit from the independent certified public accountant, the Authority shall transmit the
52 results of the audit to the Mayor and Council and shall make the audit available to the public on
53 its website.
54 (c) At least once per year, the Authority Board shall hold a public hearing on the
55 Authority's performance. The Authority Board shall publish notice of the hearing on the
4

56 Authority's website and in the District of Columbia Register at least 14 calendar days before the
57 hearing, and the hearing shall be recorded by electronic means. Within 3 days after the hearing,
58 the recording of the hearing and all written submitted testimony shall be made public on the
59 Authority's website.
60 Sec. 105. Board of Directors.
61 (a) Each Neighborhood Management Authority shall be governed by a Board of Directors
62 (“Board”), with voting and nonvoting members allocated pursuant to Title II. The powers of the
63 Authority shall be vested in the Board. A majority of the incumbent voting Board members shall
64 constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and an affirmative vote of a majority of
65 voting members shall be necessary for valid Authority action.
66 (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council,
67 for a 30-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess, nominations to a Neighborhood
68 Management Authority as prescribed in Title II. If the Council does not approve by resolution
69 within the 30-day period, the nomination shall be deemed approved.
70 (c) Except as otherwise provided, appointed Board members shall serve for a term of 3
71 years.
72 (1) The term of a Board member appointed by an Advisory Neighborhood
73 Commission shall expire on January 2 of any year that follows a general election.
74 (d) Any voting member of the Board shall be eligible for reappointment, provided that no
75 person may be nominated to serve more than two consecutive terms.
76 (e) A person appointed to fill a vacancy on the Board shall be appointed only for the
77 unexpired term of the Board member whose vacancy is being filled.
78 (f) A voting member appointed by the Mayor or Council whose term has expired may
5

79 continue to serve for 180 days after the voting member's term expires, or until their replacement
80 is appointed, whichever occurs first.
81 (g) The voting members of the Board shall elect, by a majority vote, one of the voting
82 members to serve as chairperson.
83 (h) A Board member shall not be entitled to compensation but may be reimbursed for
84 actual and necessary expenses while engaged in official duties of the Authority, including
85 transportation, parking, mileage expenses, and conference admission fees incurred.
86 (i) Unless prohibited by law, a Board member may engage in private employment, a
87 profession, or a business.
88 (j) A Board member shall not be held personally liable for an action taken in good faith
89 during the course of his or her official duties.
90 (k) The appointing authority or the Board may remove a member of the Board for
91 inefficiency, neglect of duty or misconduct in office, after giving the member a copy of the
92 charges against them and an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel in their defense
93 upon not less than 10 days’ notice.
94 (1) Removal of a member by action of the Board shall require an affirmative vote
95 of 2/3 of members. If a member is removed by the Board, the Board shall promptly notify the
96 Mayor and the Council of the action. Within 30 days after a vacancy occurs or a term expires, the
97 Mayor shall nominate someone to fill the vacancy or begin the new term. The member shall hold
98 office for the term of his appointment and shall serve until a successor has qualified.
99 (l) Members of the Board may participate in a meeting of the Board or a committee
100 thereof by means of conference telephone or similar communication equipment so long as all
101 Board members participating in the meeting and members of the public can be heard by each
6

102 other. No vacancy in the membership of the Board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise
103 all rights and perform all duties of the Agency.
104 Sec. 106. Director Appointment and Duties.
105 (a) The Board, by majority vote, shall employ a Director to run the day-to-day affairs of
106 the Authority. The Director shall be a resident of the District and shall remain a District resident
107 for the duration of his or her employment by the Authority. Failure to maintain District residency
108 shall result in a forfeiture of the position.
109 (b) The Director shall perform the following duties and responsibilities:
110 (1) Assist in the preparation of the budgets and annual reports;
111 (2) Administer all operating policies, rules, and regulations adopted by the Board;
112 (3) Employ personnel;
113 (4) Perform such other duties as may be authorized by the Board for the effective
114 and efficient management of the Authority and its facilities.
115 (c) The termination of the Director shall require the concurrence of a majority of the
116 Board.
117 Sec. 106. Representation and Indemnification.
118 (a) The officers and employees of the Authority shall not be considered District
119 government employees for purposes of the District of Columbia Employee Non-liability Act,
120 approved July 14, 1960 (74 Stat. 519; D.C. Official Code § 2-411 et seq.), and the District of
121 Columbia shall not be liable for any acts or occurrences of the Authority regardless of whether
122 the Authority purchases insurance or whether purchased insurance covers any this act or
123 omission of an this act.
124 (b) The District of Columbia may, upon request by the Authority and at the discretion of
7

125 the Attorney General for the District of Columbia (“Attorney General”), provide representation
126 through the Office of the Attorney General to the Authority and its officers and employees for
127 legal matters related to their official duties.
128 (c) The Authority may retain outside counsel, other than the Attorney General, at its own
129 expense to provide representation for the Authority and its officers and employees in actual or
130 anticipated litigation related to their official duties and functions or in any other legal
131 proceeding, lawsuit, grievance, or arbitration filed against the Authority, its officers, or its
132 employees.
133 (d) The District of Columbia and its officers and employees shall not be liable for and
134 may not be made a party to any lawsuits or claims arising from the operation of the Authority.
135 Sec. 107. Applicability of certain laws.
136 (a) The Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law
137 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.), and its implementing regulations, shall not apply
138 to the Authority.
139 (b) The Open Meetings Act, effective March 31, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-350; D.C. Official
140 Code § 2-571 et seq.), shall apply to the Authority.
141 (c) Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October
142 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), and the regulations implementing
143 those provisions, shall not apply to the Authority.
144 (d) The Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of
145 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.01 et seq.), and
146 its implementing regulations, shall not apply to the Authority.
147 (e) The First Source Employment Contract Act of 1984, effective June 29, 1984 (D.C.
8

148 Law 5-93; D.C. Official Code § 2-219.01 et seq.), shall not apply to the Authority.
149 (f) The Code of Conduct, as that term is defined in section 101(7) of the Board of Ethics
150 and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Amendment
151 Act of 2011, effective April 27, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-124; D.C. Official Code § 1-1161.01(7)),
152 shall apply to the Authority.
153 (g) The officers and employees of the Authority shall not be considered District
154 government employees for purposes of the District of Columbia Employee Non-liability Act,
155 approved July 14, 1960 (74 Stat. 519; D.C. Official Code § 2-411 et seq.), and the District of
156 Columbia shall not be liable for any acts or occurrences of the Authority regardless of whether
157 the Authority purchases insurance or whether purchased insurance covers any this act or
158 omission of an this act.
159 (h) The assets and income of the Corporation shall be exempt from taxation by the
160 District government.
161 (i) Bonds issued by the Authority and the interest thereon are exempt from District
162 taxation except estate, inheritance, and gift taxes.
163 (j) At least 51% of each Authority’s employees shall be District residents.
164 (1) For any employees providing services within the Authority, each Authority
165 shall prioritize hiring of persons currently or recently engaged in such services within the
166 Authority’s boundaries, including employees of Main Street, Clean Team, or community
167 outreach organizations.
168 Sec. 108. Prohibitions.
169 (a) The Authority shall not:
170 (1) Exercise any police or general power of the District, except those expressly
9

171 authorized by law; or,
172 (2) Exercise the power of eminent domain;
173 (b) All land and improvements acquired by the Authority shall be held in the name of the
174 Authority, except that title to the property shall not be transferred by the Authority to any person
175 or entity other than the District government.
176 (c) The District government shall not eliminate or reduce the level of any services
177 customarily provided in the District to any similar geographic area because such area is within
178 the Authority boundaries and shall continue to provide its customary services and levels of each
179 service to such area unless a reduction in service is part of a District-wide pro rata reduction in
180 services necessitated by fiscal considerations or budgetary priorities.
181 Sec. 109. Authority of the Chief Financial Officer.
182 The CFO shall exercise authority over the Authority consistent with section 424 of the
183 Home Rule Act.
184 Sec. 110. BID Formation Within Neighborhood Management Authority Boundaries.
185 (a) An additional real property tax or possessory interest tax may be assessed and levied
186 by the District on, and payable by, the owners of taxable properties or holders of a possessory
187 interest within Authority Boundaries as established in Title II of this act.
188 (1) For the purposes of this section, “special assessment participants” means
189 owners, or principals, agents, partners, managers, trustees, stockholders, officers, or directors of
190 owners of taxable properties, or holders of a possessory interest, and commercial tenants within
191 an established special assessment area.
192 (b) In order to implement an assessment pursuant to this section, an application shall be
193 submitted by one or more owners of taxable property within the Authority to the Board for
10

194 consideration. The application shall be duly sworn under oath before a notary public who holds a
195 valid license in the District, and shall contain:
196 (1) A statement setting forth the name and address of the applicants;
197 (2) A statement signed by the owners (or their authorized representatives) who
198 own at least a 51% interest in the most recent assessed value of the taxable properties in the
199 geographic area of the proposed assessment area as a whole, and at least 25% in number of the
200 individual taxable properties of record in the assessment area as a whole;
201 (3) A tax assessor’s map of the geographic area comprising the assessment area,
202 clearly designating the boundaries and each property by street address, lot, and square number to
203 be included within the assessment area;
204 (4) A list, by street address, lot, and square number, of all taxable property within
205 the proposed special assessment area; and the most recent assessed value of each taxable
206 property to the extent reasonably ascertainable from District property tax records or a final
207 determination of the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia, and a
208 list of the names and addresses of all record owners and commercial tenants within the proposed
209 special assessment area, to the extent reasonably ascertainable;
210 (A) For the purposes hereof, individual taxable properties shall mean
211 properties identified by separate lot and square numbers to the extent reasonably ascertainable
212 from the records of the Office of Taxation and Revenue or Office of Recorder of Deeds;
213 provided, that any property subdivided into separate condominium units shall constitute a single
214 property for the purpose of determining the number of taxable properties referred to in this
215 paragraph; provided further, that such condominium units shall constitute separate properties for
216 purposes of assessing special assessment area charges. Changes in the assessed values occurring
11

217 after submission of an application, whether through regular reassessment, appeals, or otherwise,
218 shall not affect the validity of the application; and,
219 (5) The annual proposed total special assessment taxes for the first year of
220 collections, and the formula used to determine each special assessment participant’s tax, which
221 shall be based upon either assessed value, square footage, or a uniform fixed tax per building.
222 Special assessment taxes may vary by class and type of property provided that they are applied
223 fairly and equitably within the assessment area;
224 (c) The application shall be considered approved by a 2/3 vote of voting members the
225 Board at a meeting called for such purposes. The Board shall submit legislation effectuating the
226 application to Council for consideration and approval.
227 (d) If a portion of the special assessment area boundary falls outside of the boundaries of
228 the Authority, approval of the special assessment area application by the Authority pursuant to
229 this section shall constitute an expansion of the Authority’s boundaries.
230 (e) No later than 120 days after approval of a special assessment area pursuant to this
231 section, the Authority shall amend its bylaws and procedures to incorporate special assessment
232 participants in the Authority’s governance, including:
233 (1) Nomination and election of special assessment participants to fill Board seats
234 enumerated in Title II of this act;
235 (2) Procedures for expanding the special assessment area; and,
236 (3) A process for special assessment participants to vote on amendments to the
237 special assessment rates and formula.
238 (f) The special assessment shall be collected pursuant to procedures identical to those
239 enumerated in section 16 of the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29,
12

240 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.15).
241 (g) The Mayor shall not hold a hearing on, or approve for registration, any BID
242 corporation application, as described in sections 6 and 7 of the Business Improvement Districts
243 Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.05) that
244 overlaps, in whole or in part, with the boundary of a Neighborhood Management Authority
245 established pursuant to this act.
246 Sec. 111. Service Areas and Expansion of Boundaries.
247 (a) Each Authority shall have its initial boundaries established according to Title II of this
248 act.
249 (b) Notwithstanding section 110, the boundaries of the Authority may be expanded by
250 submitting an application to the Board of Directors, which shall be approved by a 2/3 vote of the
251 voting members of the Board. The Board shall submit any approved applications for expansion
252 for Council review by resolution, which shall be deemed approved after a 45-day period of
253 review, excluding weekends, holidays, and days of Council recess.
254 (1) The application shall be duly sworn under oath before a notary public who
255 holds a valid license in the District, and shall contain:
256 (A) A statement setting forth the name and address of the applicants;
257 (B) A map of the proposed expansion area;
258 (C) A statement signed by the owners or their authorized representatives
259 who own at least a 51% interest properties in the geographic area of the proposed assessment
260 area as a whole;
261 (D) A description of the service needs for the proposed area of expansion,
262 and whether the proposed expansion would result in an increase in dedicated revenues for the
13

263 Authority;
264 (E) An explanation of why the proposed expansion would be consistent
265 with the purposes of the Authority and with the existing boundary.
266 Sec. 112. Bond Issuance.
267 (a) The Authority, pursuant to section 490(a)(6) of the Home Rule Act, may, to carry out
268 the authorized purposes of the Authority:
269 (1) Incur debt by the issuance of revenue bonds; and
270 (2) Borrow or lend money to finance or assist in the financing of undertakings
271 authorized by this chapter.
272 (b) The Authority may not use the proceeds of bonds issued by the Authority unless the
273 Board:
274 (1) Determines that the use of the proceeds meets the requirements of this chapter
275 and § 1-204.90; and
276 (2) Approves a resolution, describing the determination required by paragraph (1)
277 of this subsection.
278 (c) Regardless of their form or character, bonds and other debt instruments of the
279 Authority are negotiable instruments for all purposes of Subtitle I of Title 28, subject only to the
280 provisions of the bonds for registration.
281 (d) No director, employee, or agent of the Authority shall be personally liable for any
282 payment required to be made under any bond issued by the Authority.
283 (e) No notice, proceeding, consent, or approval shall be required for the issuance or
284 performance of any bond of the Authority or the execution of any instrument relating thereto or
285 to the security therefor, except as provided in this chapter or in guidelines issued by the
14

286 Authority.
287 (f) The Authority may stipulate by resolution the terms for sale of its bonds in accordance
288 with this chapter, including the following:
289 (1) The date a bond bears;
290 (2) The date a bond matures;
291 (3) Whether bonds are issued as serial bonds, as term bonds, or as a combination
292 thereof;
293 (4) The denomination;
294 (5) The interest rate or rates, or variable rate or rates changing from time to time
295 in accordance with a base or formula;
296 (6) The registration privileges;
297 (7) The medium and method for payment; and
298 (8) The terms of redemption.
299 (g) The Authority may sell its bonds at public or private sale and may determine the price
300 for sale.
301 (h) A pledge of the Authority is binding from the time it is made. Any funds or property
302 pledged are subject to the lien of a pledge without physical delivery. The lien of a pledge is
303 binding as against parties having any tort, contract or other claim against the Authority
304 regardless of notice. Neither a resolution nor any other instrument creating a pledge need be
305 recorded.
306 (i) Bonds issued under the provisions of this section do not constitute an obligation of the
307 District and are payable solely from the revenues or assets of the Authority. Each bond issued
308 under this section must contain on its face a statement that the Authority is not obligated to pay
15

309 principal or interest except from the revenues or assets pledged and that neither the faith and
310 credit nor the taxing power of the District is pledged to the payment of the principal or interest
311 on a bond.
312 (j) The District pledges to the holders of any bonds issued under this section that the
313 District will not limit or alter rights vested in the Authority to fulfill agreements made with
314 holders of the bonds, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders of the bonds
315 until the bonds, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of
316 interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf
317 of such holders are fully met and discharged. The Authority may include this pledge of the
318 District in any agreement with the holders of bonds.
319 (k) The signature of any officer of the Authority that appears on a bond remains valid if
320 that person ceases to hold that office.
321 TITLE II. NEIGHBORHOOD MANAGEMENT AUTHORITY FORMATIONS.
322 SUBTITLE A. DUKE DISTRICT NEIGHBORHOOD MANAGEMENT AUTHORITY.
323 Sec. 201. Duke District Neighborhood Management Authority.
324 (a) Notwithstanding other provisions of this act, the boundaries of the Duke District
325 Neighborhood Management Authority (“Authority”) are as follows:
326 (1) The area bounded by S Street, N.W., from the intersection of Florida Avenue,
327 N.W. and 4th Street, N.W., to 14th Street, N.W.; 14th Street, N.W., from S Street, N.W., to U
328 Street, N.W.; U Street, N.W., from 14th Street, N.W., to 17th Street, N.W.; 17th Street, N.W.,
329 from U Street, N.W., to Florida Avenue, N.W.; Florida Avenue, N.W., from 17th Street, N.W.,
330 to W Street, N.W.; W Street, N.W., from the intersection of Florida Avenue, N.W. and 16th
331 Street, N.W., to the intersection of Florida Avenue, N.W. and 15th Street, N.W.; Florida Avenue,
16

332 N.W., from 15th Street, N.W., to Barry Place, N.W.; Barry Place, N.W., from Florida Avenue,
333 N.W., to Georgia Avenue, N.W.; Georgia Avenue, N.W., from Barry Place, N.W., to Florida
334 Avenue, N.W.; Florida Avenue, N.W., from Georgia Avenue, N.W., to S Street, N.W.; and,
335 (2) All Lots within Square 3075.
336 (b) The general purposes of the Authority shall be to:
337 (1) Promote the general welfare of the residents, employers, employees, property
338 owners, commercial tenants, consumers, and the general public within the Authority’s boundary;
339 (2) Maintain and grow the Duke District as a mixed-use center with theaters, arts
340 and music establishments, restaurants, shops, neighborhood services, and housing serving a
341 range of incomes and household types;
342 (3) Promote cultural tourism initiatives, public art, signage, and other
343 improvements that recognize the Duke District as a nationally significant Black history landmark
344 and a district with prominent LGBTQ+ community sites;
345 (4) Serve as a coordinating body for the District’s public safety and enforcement
346 resources within the service area;
347 (5) Assist in implementation of District policy and planning priorities that overlap
348 or relate to the Duke District, including small area plans and the Cultural Plan for the District of
349 Columbia;
350 (6) Supplement cleaning and maintenance of streets, parks, plazas, and other
351 public spaces within the service area;
352 (7) Promote, develop, and maintain music, culture, and entertainment
353 programming and events, directly or under contract, at the Lincoln Theatre, Howard Theatre, and
354 other public spaces and facilities within the Duke District;
17

355 (8) Maintain and improve Duke Ellington Plaza on the 600 Block of T Street,
356 N.W.;
357 (9) Solicit offers, accept unsolicited offers, and execute any lease on behalf of the
358 District of Columbia with respect to:
359 (A) The Lincoln Theatre site, consisting of the land and improvements
360 described for purposes of assessment and taxation as Lots 809 of Square 273, with a street
361 address of 1215 U Street, N.W., and Lots 805 and 808 in Square 273, with frontages on the 1200
362 block of V Street, N.W.;
363 (B) The Howard Theatre site, consisting of the land and improvements
364 described for purposes of assessment and taxation as Lot 0090 of Square 0041, with a street
365 address of 620 T Street, N.W.; and,
366 (C) The site consisting of the land and improvements described for
367 purposes of assessment and taxation as Lot 25 in Square 440, with a street address of 625 T
368 Street, N.W.;
369 (10) Provide operating budget support to pre-existing community-based
370 organizations that provide services within the Duke District, including Main Streets and Clean
371 Teams; and,
372 (11) Other functions as delegated by the Mayor.
373 Sec. 202. Transfers of Jurisdiction.
374 All functions assigned, authorities delegated, positions, personnel, property, records, and
375 unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made
376 available to the Department of General Services or Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
18

377 Development are transferred to the Duke District Neighborhood Management Authority for the
378 following properties:
379 (1) The Lincoln Theatre site, consisting of the land and improvements described
380 for purposes of assessment and taxation as Lots 809 of Square 273, with a street address of 1215
381 U Street, N.W., and Lots 805 and 808 in Square 273, with frontages on the 1200 block of V
382 Street, N.W.;
383 (2) The Howard Theatre site, consisting of the land and improvements described
384 for purposes of assessment and taxation as Lot 0090 of Square 0041, with a street address of 620
385 T Street, N.W.; and,
386 (3) The site consisting of the land and improvements described for purposes of
387 assessment and taxation as Lot 25 in Square 440, with a street address of 625 T Street, N.W.;
388 Sec. 203. Board of Directors.
389 (a) Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, The Duke District Neighborhood
390 Management Authority Board of Directors (“Board”) shall be comprised of nine voting members
391 appointed in accordance with this section.
392 (b) Four voting members shall be appointed by the Mayor, of which:
393 (1) One shall represent a restaurant, bar, or other service business in the Duke
394 District;
395 (2) One shall represent a business in the Duke District that is not licensed to sell
396 alcoholic beverages or cannabis;
397 (3) One shall represent Howard University or Howard University Hospital;
398 (4) One shall represent the owner or operator of a performance venue, legitimate
399 theater, or other cultural institution within the Duke District.
19

400 (6) Of the members first appointed pursuant to this subsection, two shall serve for
401 a term of two years and two shall serve for a term of three years.
402 (c) One voting member shall be a resident with a permanent residence within Duke
403 District appointed by each Advisory Neighborhood Commission with four or more single
404 member districts contained within the Authority boundaries. The member shall be appointed by a
405 majority vote of the commission at a meeting called for such purposes.
406 (d) Three voting members shall be appointed by the Council, of which:
407 (1) One shall represent the owner or operator of a performance venue, legitimate
408 theater, or other cultural institution within the Duke District;
409 (2) One shall have proven expertise in municipal finance, business finance, or
410 economic development;
411 (3) One shall represent a business or commercial property within the Duke
412 District; and
413 (4) One shall be a Duke District resident that is not associated with or employed
414 by a business within the Duke District.
415 (5) Of the members first appointed pursuant to this subsection, two shall serve for
416 a term of two years and two shall serve for a term of three years.
417 (e) Two additional voting members may represent owners, or principals, agents, partners,
418 managers, trustees, stockholders, officers, or directors of owners, and commercial tenants of
419 taxable property subject to a special assessment pursuant to section 110 of this act.
420 (1) Seats on the Authority Board enumerated in this subsection shall only be filled
421 upon the enactment of a special assessment area within the Duke District and shall otherwise
422 remain vacant and not be counted for the purposes of establishing a quorum of the Authority
20

423 Board.
424 (f) Non-voting members of the Board shall include the following ex-officio members:
425 (1) The Director of the Authority, or the Director's designee, who shall serve as
426 vice chair of the Board;
427 (2) The Director of any Main Street Program organization within the Authority
428 boundary;
429 (3) The Chief of Police, or their designee;
430 (4) The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration, or their
431 designee;
432 (5) The Director of the Department of Public Works, or their designee;
433 (6) The Director of the Department of Transportation; or their designee;
434 (7) The Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development, or their
435 designee;
436 (8) The Director of the Department of Small and Local Business Development, or
437 their designee;
438 (9) The Director of the Commission on Arts and Humanities, or their designee;
439 and
440 (10) The Director of the Mayor’s Office on Nightlife and Culture, or their
441 designee.
442 (g) The Council may establish an Interim Board of Directors (“Interim Board”) consisting
443 of no more than five members to manage the affairs of the Authority until the Board established
444 pursuant to this section convenes its first meeting. Upon the convening of the first meeting of the
445 Board, the Interim Board shall dissolve.
21

446 Sec. 204. Duke District Neighborhood Management Fund.
447 (a) There is established as a special fund the Duke District Neighborhood Management
448 Fund ("Fund"), which shall be administered by the Duke District Management Authority
449 (“Authority”) in accordance with this section.
450 (b) Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited into the Fund:
451 (1) Appropriated funds;
452 (2) All parking meter revenue collected within the Greater U Street Performance
453 Parking Zone established by section 8a of the Performance Parking Pilot Zone Act of 2008,
454 effective November 25, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-279; D.C. Official Code § 50-2531) that exceeds
455 baseline revenue from metered spaces within the zone as of October 1, 2023, as determined by
456 the Director of the Department of Transportation, provided, that up to 5% may be used to pay for
457 meter maintenance and related infrastructure in that zone;
458 (3) Any special assessment taxes collected pursuant to section 110 of this this act;
459 (4) Revenues from PILOT agreements for properties to contribute to the Fund,
460 established pursuant to section 3(b) of the Payments in Lieu of Taxes Act of 2004, effective
461 (D.C. Law 15-293, D.C. Official Code § 1-308.02(b));
462 (6) Deed and recordation transfers collected pursuant to section 204 of this act;
463 (5) Grants, fees, donations, or gifts from public or private sources, subject to
464 approval by the Board;
465 (6) Proceeds from any proceeding, settlement, or contract in which the District is
466 a party and the funds have been assigned to the Authority;
467 (7) Interest earned from the deposit or investment of monies from the Fund; and,
468 (8) All revenues, receipts, and fees of whatever source derived from the operation
22

469 of the Fund.
470 (c)(1) Money in the Fund shall be used for all purposes related to the mission and
471 operation of the Authority.
472 (2) Subject to approval of the Authority Board, money in the fund may be
473 allocated to subordinate agencies of the District to provide enhanced programs or services related
474 to the mission and operation of the Authority, provided, that such appropriations shall not be
475 used to supplant local funds typically appropriated for agency operating budgets or services that
476 would otherwise be provided by such agencies within the Authority’s boundary.
477 (d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance
478 of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
479 (2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
480 appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in this
481 chapter without regard to fiscal year limitation. Any monies received but not expended in a given
482 fiscal year shall be retained by the Fund.
483 (3) No revenues collected on behalf of the Authority and transferred to or
484 deposited in the Fund shall be commingled with any funds of the District.
485 Sec. 205. Duke District Deed and Recordation Transfers.
486 In fiscal years ending on or after October 1, 2025, the Chief Financial Officer shall
487 deposit into the Duke District Management Fund 40% of the Deed Transfer and Recordation
488 Taxes attributable to new buildings constructed within the boundaries of the Authority, or such
489 successor record or assessment and taxation lots as may be created through future subdivision or
490 creation of condominium units.
491 SUBTITLE B. COLUMBIA HEIGHTS NEIGHBORHOOD MANAGEMENT
23

492 AUTHORITY.
493 Sec. 206. Columbia Heights Neighborhood Management Authority.
494 (a) Notwithstanding other provisions of this act, the boundaries of the Columbia Heights
495 Neighborhood Management Authority (“Authority”) are as follows:
496 (1) The area bounded by: (A) 1100 through 1500 blocks of Monroe Street, N.W.;
497 (B) 1100 through 1500 blocks of Harvard Street, N.W.; (C) 2900 through 3400 blocks of 11th
498 Street, N.W.; and (D) 2900 through 3300 blocks of 16th Street, N.W.; including both sides of
499 boundary streets;
500 (2) All Lots within Square 2667 and Square 2669; and,
501 (2) An area extending 500 feet from either side of the centerline of the 2300
502 through 3700 blocks of 14th Street, N.W.
503 (b) The general purposes of the Authority shall be to:
504 (1) Promote the general welfare of the residents, employers, employees, property
505 owners, commercial tenants, consumers, and the general public within the Authority’s boundary;
506 (2) Effectuate District policy and planning priorities that overlap or intersect with
507 the Authority’s geographic area;
508 (4) Represent the District of Columbia Government on the board of the DC-USA
509 Mall, including management and operation of the garage facility;
510 (5) Maintain the Columbia Heights Metro station area as a thriving mixed-use
511 community center, anchored by mixed-income housing, community-serving retail, offices, civic
512 uses, and public plazas.
513 (6) Strive to retain and elevate the neighborhood’s extraordinary cultural diversity
514 and place a priority on development and services that meet the needs of local residents;
24

515 (7) Attract and maintain a diverse array of businesses to address commercial
516 vacancies;
517 (8) Supplement cleaning, maintenance, and programming of parks, plazas, and
518 public spaces within the Authority boundary, including residential blocks;
519 (9) Serve as a coordinating body for the District’s public safety and enforcement
520 resources within the service area
521 (10) Pursue agreements with private property owners and the National Park
522 Service to expand accessible public space; and,
523 (11) Provide operating budget support to pre-existing community-based
524 organizations that provide services within the Authority boundary, including Main Streets and
525 Clean Teams.
526 Sec. 207. Transfers of Jurisdiction.
527 (a) All functions assigned, authorities delegated, positions, personnel, property, records,
528 and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made
529 available to the Department of General Services or Department of Parks and Recreation are
530 transferred to the Columbia Heights Neighborhood Management Authority (“Authority”) for the
531 following properties:
532 (1) Columbia Heights Civic Plaza in Square 2843, Lot 834;
533 (2) Columbia Heights Metro Plaza in Square 2672, Lot 887;
534 (3) The public space at the northeast corner of 14th Street, N.W., and Irving
535 Street, N.W., in Square 2848, Lot 871;
536 (b) The Authority shall pursue a memorandum of understanding or other contractual
537 agreement with the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority for maintenance of public
25

538 space in immediate proximity of entrances to the Columbia Heights Metrorail Station that are not
539 owned by the District.
540 Sec. 208. Board of Directors.
541 (a) Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, Columbia Heights Neighborhood
542 Management Authority Board of Directors (“Board”) shall be comprised of nine voting members
543 appointed in accordance with this section.
544 (b) Four voting members shall be appointed by the Mayor, of which:
545 (1) One shall represent a business within or immediately abutting central
546 Columbia Heights;
547 (2) One shall represent a business within the Authority boundaries that is
548 otherwise located outside of central Columbia Heights;
549 (3) One shall be a resident with a permanent residence within or immediately
550 abutting central Columbia Heights; and
551 (4) One shall be a resident with a permanent residence within the Authority
552 boundaries that is otherwise located outside of central Columbia Heights.
553 (5) Of the members first appointed pursuant to this subsection, two shall serve for
554 a term of two years and two shall serve for a term of three years.
555 (c) One voting member shall be a person with a permanent residence within the Authority
556 boundary appointed by ANC 1A, nominated by a majority vote of the commission.
557 (d) Four voting members shall be appointed by the Council, of which:
558 (1) One shall represent a business within or immediately abutting central
559 Columbia Heights;
560 (2) One shall represent a business within the Authority boundaries that is
26

561 otherwise located outside of central Columbia Heights;
562 (3) One shall be a resident with a permanent residence within or immediately
563 abutting central Columbia Heights; and
564 (4) One shall be a resident with a permanent residence within the Authority
565 boundaries that is otherwise located outside of central Columbia Heights.
566 (3) Of the members first appointed pursuant to this subsection, two shall serve for
567 a term of two years and two shall serve for a term of three years.
568 (e) For the purposes of this section, the term “central Columbia Heights” means the area
569 bounded by Monroe Street, N.W., 16th Street, N.W., Columbia Road, N.W., and 13th Street,
570 N.W..
571 (f) Two additional voting members may represent owners, or principals, agents, partners,
572 managers, trustees, stockholders, officers, or directors of owners, and commercial tenants of
573 taxable property subject to a special assessment pursuant to section 110 of this act.
574 (1) Seats on the Authority Board enumerated in this subsection shall only be filled
575 upon approval of a special assessment area within the Duke District and shall otherwise remain
576 vacant and not be counted for the purposes of establishing a quorum of the Authority Board.
577 (g) Non-voting members of the Board shall include the following ex-officio members:
578 (1) The Director of the Authority, or the Director's designee, who shall serve as
579 vice chair of the Board;
580 (2) The Director of any Main Street Program organization within the Authority
581 boundary;
582 (3) The Chief of Police, or their designee;
583 (4) The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration, or their
27

584 designee;
585 (5) The Director of the Department of Public Works, or their designee;
586 (6) The Director of the Department of Transportation; or their designee;
587 (7) The Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development, or their
588 designee;
589 (8) The Director of the Department of Small and Local Business Development, or
590 their designee;
591 (9) The Director of the Department of Behavioral Health, or their designee;
592 (10) The Director of the Department of Parks and Recreation, or their designee;
593 and,
594 (11) The Director of the Department of General Services, or their designee.
595 (h) The Council may establish an Interim Board of Directors (“Interim Board”) consisting
596 of no more than five members to manage the affairs of the Authority until the Board established
597 pursuant to this section convenes its first meeting. Upon the convening of the first meeting of the
598 Board, the Interim Board shall dissolve.
599 Sec. 209. Columbia Heights Neighborhood Management Fund.
600 (a) There is established as a special fund the Columbia Heights Neighborhood
601 Management Fund ("Fund"), which shall be administered by the Columbia Heights
602 Neighborhood Management Authority (“Authority”) in accordance with this section.
603 (b) Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited into the Fund:
604 (1) Appropriated funds;
605 (2) All parking-meter revenue collected within the Columbia Heights
606 Performance Parking Zone established by section 4 of the Performance Parking Pilot Zone Act
28

607 of 2008, effective November 25, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-279; D.C. Official Code § 50-2533.) that
608 exceeds baseline revenue from metered spaces within the zone as of October 1, 2025, as
609 determined by the Director of the Department of Transportation, provided, that up to 5% may be
610 used to pay for meter maintenance and related infrastructure in that zone;
611 (3) Revenue collected from the DC-USA parking garage pursuant to section 212
612 of this act;
613 (4) Targeted Retail Vacancy fees collected pursuant to section 210 of this act;
614 (5) Alcoholic beverage tax revenue collected pursuant to section 212 of this act;
615 (6) Special property tax assessment revenues collected pursuant to section 110 of
616 this act;
617 (7) Revenues from PILOT agreements for properties to contribute to the Fund,
618 established pursuant to section 3(b) of the Payments in Lieu of Taxes Act of 2004, effective
619 (D.C. Law 15-293, D.C. Official Code § 1-308.02(b));
620 (8) Grants, fees, donations, or gifts from public or private sources, subject to
621 approval by the Board;
622 (9) Proceeds from any proceeding, settlement, or contract in which the District is
623 a party and the funds have been assigned to the Authority;
624 (10) Interest earned from the deposit or investment of monies from the Fund; and,
625 (11) All revenues, receipts, and fees of whatever source derived from the
626 operation of the Fund.
627 (c) (1) Money in the Fund shall be used for all purposes related to the mission and
628 operation of the Authority.
629 (2) Subject to approval of the Board, money in the fund may be allocated to
29

630 subordinate agencies of the District to provide enhanced programs or services related to the
631 mission and operation of the Authority, provided, that such appropriations shall not be used to
632 supplant local funds typically appropriated for agency operating budgets or services that would
633 otherwise be provided by such agencies within the Authority’s boundary.
634 (d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance
635 of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
636 (2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
637 appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in this
638 chapter without regard to fiscal year limitation. Any monies received but not expended in a given
639 fiscal year shall be retained by the Fund.
640 (3) No revenues collected on behalf of the Authority and transferred to or
641 deposited in the Fund shall be commingled with any funds of the District.
642 Sec. 210. Targeted Retail Vacancy Fee.
643 (a) There is levied a Columbia Heights retail vacancy fee, which shall apply to all
644 properties within the Columbia Heights Neighborhood Management Authority which contain
645 more than [ ] square feet of leasable commercial floor area.
646 (b) The retail vacancy fee shall be calculated as follows:
647 (1) $[ ] per square foot for the first [ ] square feet of vacant commercial space.
648 (2) $[ ] per square foot of the square footage of vacant commercial space above [ ]
649 square feet.
650 Sec. 211. Alcoholic beverage tax revenue to be deposited in Columbia Heights
651 Neighborhood Management Fund.
652 (a) The holder of an off-premises retailer license shall be permitted to apply for one 25%
30

653 grocery store class A retailer license for a grocery store that meets the requirements of § 25-
654 333(f) and is located in square 2837.
655 (b) If a 25% grocery store class A retailer license is granted pursuant to subsection (a) of
656 this section, any gross receipts tax on the sale of alcoholic beverages collected pursuant to § 47-
657 2002(a)(B)(3A) above the baseline amount, as determined by the Chief Financial Officer, in the
658 fiscal year prior to the issuance of the license shall be deposited in the Columbia Heights
659 Neighborhood Management Fund as established in section 208 of this act.
660 Sec. 212. DC-USA Garage.
661 (a) All functions assigned, authorities delegated, property, records, and unexpended
662 balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available for the
663 DC-USA Garage Unit (“Garage”), as defined in § 47-4608(a)(4), are transferred to the Columbia
664 Heights Management Authority (“Authority”).
665 (b) The Director of the Authority, or their designee, shall be the District’s representative
666 on the condo board, or any successor, that governs the Garage. The Director’s policy priorities in
667 representing the District’s interests shall be as follows:
668 (1) Adjusting pricing for public use of the Garage, in coordination with the
669 District Department of Transportation and in furtherance of the goals of the Columbia Heights
670 Performance Parking Zone, as established in section 4 of the Performance Parking Pilot Zone
671 Act of 2008, effective November 25, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-279; D.C. Official Code § 50-2533);
672 (2) Establishing procedures for use of the Garage during snow emergencies;
673 (3) Utilizing excess Garage capacity to meet community needs, including:
674 (A) Offsetting the removal of residential parking in proximity to the
675 Garage that may result from multimodal projects, with priority given to:
31

676 (i) Residents of income-restricted and senior housing;
677 (ii) Residents of multifamily properties with little to no off-street
678 parking; and,
679 (iii) Residents with disability placards;
680 (B) Storage of vending carts and equipment used by licensed vendors in
681 the Columbia Heights/Mount Pleasant Vending Zone; and,
682 (C) Other uses of space in furtherance of the purposes of the Authority as
683 defined in section 206 of this this act.
684 TITLE III. COLUMBIA HEIGHTS PERFORMANCE PARKING ZONE.
685 Sec. 301. Columbia Heights Performance Parking Zone.
686 The Performance Parking Pilot Zone Act of 2008, effective November 25, 2008 (D.C.
687 Law 17-279; D.C. Official Code § 50-2501 et seq.), is amended as follows:
688 (a) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 50-2533) is revived as of the effective date of this
689 section, and amended as follows:
690 (1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “Columbia Heights
691 Retail Performance Parking Pilot Zone” and inserting the phrase “Columbia Heights
692 Performance Parking Zone” in its place.
693 (2) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
694 (A) Strike the phrase “Columbia Heights Retail Performance Parking Pilot
695 Zone” and insert the phrase “Columbia Heights Performance Parking Zone” in its place.
696 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
697 “(2) An area extending 500 feet from either side of the centerline of the 2300
698 through 3700 blocks of 14th Street, N.W.; and,”.
32

699 (3) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
700 “(a-1) The Mayor may alter the boundaries of the zone; provided, that the Council and
701 the affected Advisory Neighborhood Commissions ("ANC") are provided with 30 days' written
702 notice, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, of the Mayor's intent to do so, and any
703 ANC recommendation, if provided, is given great weight pursuant to section 13 of the Advisory
704 Neighborhood Commissions Act, effective March 26, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-58; D.C. Official Code
705 § 1-309.10).”.
706 (4) Subsection (b) is repealed.
707 (5) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
708 “(c) Pursuant to section 2, the Mayor shall adjust fees to manage curbside and off-street
709 parking availability, facilitate commercial loading and pick-up and drop-off, dissuade repeat
710 parking violations, and manage congestion.
711 “(1) The Department of Transportation shall coordinate with the Columbia
712 Heights Neighborhood Management Authority, as established in Subtitle B of Title 2 of the
713 Neighborhood Management Authority Establishment Act of 2025, effective ______, to ensure
714 that the cost of off-street garage parking and curbside parking meter rates within the Zone are
715 coordinated to effectuate the goals of this section.”.
716 (6) A new subsection (c-1) is added to read as follows:
717 "(c-1) The Mayor may establish metered or pay-by-phone parking for residential parking
718 permit blocks within the zone in order to dissuade curbside occupancy on such blocks by
719 vehicles without a residential permit.”.
720 (7) Subsection (d) is repealed.
721 (b) Section 2a (D.C. Official Code § 50-2531.01) is repealed.
33

722 TITLE IV. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS.
723 Sec. 402. Fiscal impact statement.
724 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
725 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
726 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
727 Sec. 303. Effective date.
728 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
729 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
730 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
731 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
732 Columbia Register.
34